Louisiana, session 2026, HB187.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:981(A) and (D) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
13:961(J) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§961. Court reporters; generally
* * *
J. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a
stenographer-reporter of the Board of Tax Appeals as authorized pursuant to R.S.
47:1404 and 1416 shall prepare, certify, and charge for a transcript in accordance
with the board's rules. The stenographer-reporter shall be considered to have the
authority of an official reporter for the board in the same manner as if appointed by
the district court for the parish of the board's domicile and shall be considered a
certified digital reporter during his or her continued employment in that capacity.
* * *
§981. Court reporter pools
A. There is hereby established a court reporter pool of thirty emergency
court reporters employed or approved by the supreme court from which said court
reporters may be assigned from time to time to any of the various district courts in
the state as the need arises in order that transcripts for criminal appeals and other
necessary purposes may be timely lodged in the appellate courts.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 187 ENROLLED
D. In addition to all fees for court reporters provided for in R.S. 13:961, each
court reporter in the pool shall be paid an annual salary by the state in the amount of
fifteen thousand dollars. The supreme court shall provide for the salaries, related
costs, and travel expenses of the court reporters in its annual budget for operations
of the court. Reimbursement for travel expenses of pool court reporters shall not
exceed the amount allowed other state employees. Notwithstanding any other
provision of law to the contrary, an emergency court reporter appointed pursuant to
the authority of this Section shall prepare, certify, and charge for a transcript in
accordance with rules duly adopted by the Supreme Court for that purpose. An
emergency court reporter under this Section shall be considered to have the authority
of an official reporter for a district court in the same manner as if appointed by it.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.